North Carolina, session 2025, HB534.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Rowan-Cabarrus Community College and
Wake Technical Community College in equal amounts to establish training sites for certification
as a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner.
SECTION 1.(b) Funds allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
used as follows by each community college:
(1) Up to one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000) shall be used to hire one
full-time faculty member.
(2) Up to one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000) shall be used to hire one
clinical coordinator.
(3) Up to forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) shall be used for equipment and
supplies.
(4) Up to ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) shall be used for program
development and accreditation costs.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H534-v-1*